Utah statutes.
17C-2-106.   Board resolution approving urban renewal project area plan -- Requirements.

Each board resolution approving a draft urban renewal project area plan as the project area plan under Subsection 17C-2-102(1)(a) (x) shall contain:

(1)  a legal description of the boundaries of the project area that is the subject of the project area plan;

(2)  the agency's purposes and intent with respect to the project area;

(3)  the project area plan incorporated by reference;

(4)  a statement that the board previously made a finding of blight within the project area and the date of the board's finding of blight; and

(5)  the board findings and determinations that:

(a)  there is a need to effectuate a public purpose;

(b)  there is a public benefit under the analysis described in Subsection 17C-2-103(2);

(c)  it is economically sound and feasible to adopt and carry out the project area plan;

(d)  the project area plan conforms to the community's general plan; and

(e)  carrying out the project area plan will promote the public peace, health, safety, and welfare of the community in which the project area is located.



Amended by Chapter 364, 2007 General Session

